Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,105.01
Acceptance of waste by facility; when.

No waste shall be accepted by the facility until the amendments to the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact contained in Laws 1991, LB 837, are in effect in Kansas, Oklahoma, Louisiana, and Arkansas and have been ratified by Congress.

Laws 1991, LB 837, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1201, § 10.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.